Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 8.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-129
Denying or interfering with admittance to public facilities; penalty.

(1) Any person or agent of such person who denies or interferes with admittance to or enjoyment of the public facilities enumerated in section 20-127 or otherwise interferes with the rights of a totally or partially blind, deaf or hard of hearing, or physically disabled person under section 20-127 or sections 20-131.01 to 20-131.04 is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

(2) Any person or agent of such person who denies or interferes with admittance to or enjoyment of the public facilities enumerated in section 20-127 or otherwise interferes with the rights of a bona fide trainer of a service animal when training such animal under section 20-127 is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1971, LB 496, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1971, § 43-636;

Laws 1975, LB 83, § 5;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 76;

Laws 1980, LB 932, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 254, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 667, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB806, § 8.